Washington statutes.
RCW 2.06.022

Effective date for Snohomish county judicial position—Initial term.

The new judicial position for the first division, district 2, Snohomish county created pursuant to the 1989 amendment to RCW 2.06.020 shall become effective January 1, 1990, and shall be filled by gubernatorial appointment.

The person appointed by the governor shall hold office until the general election to be held in November 1990. At the general election, the judge appointed shall be entitled to run for a term of six years or until the second Monday in January 1997, and until a successor is elected and qualified. Thereafter, the judge shall be elected for a term of six years and until a successor is elected and qualified, commencing with the second Monday in January succeeding the election.

[ 1989 c 328 s 11.]

NOTES:

Intent—1989 c 328: See note following RCW 2.08.061.